North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 16. Money Transmitters Act. [Repealed]

§§ 53-192 through 53-208.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-443, s. 1, effective November 1, 2001, and applicable to contracts entered into on or after that date.

Cross References.

For the Money Transmitters Act, see now G.S. 53-208.1 et seq.